Hawaii, session 2026, HB307.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that January 4, 2026, marks the fiftieth anniversary of the first successful landing on Kahoolawe by nine courageous individuals, known as the "Kahoolawe 9," in support of Native Hawaiian sovereignty and self-determination, initiating an island wide movement to "Stop the Bombing" and the United States' military use of the island of Kahoolawe. The legislature further finds that in 1976, the Protect Kahoʻolawe ʻOhana was formed and took legal action by filing a federal lawsuit against the United States Navy, citing violations of environmental laws, historic preservation, and religious freedom, thus highlighting the cultural and ecological significance of the island. The legislature additionally finds that on October 22, 1990, President George H.W. Bush ordered the cessation of bombing and target practice on Kahoʻolawe, and in November 1990, the United States Congress established the Kahoolawe island conveyance commission to facilitate the return of Kahoolawe to the State, leading the state legislature and Governor John Waihee III to create the Kahoolawe island reserve under chapter 6K, Hawaii Revised Statutes. The legislature recognizes that Kahoolawe, long scarred by ranching and military activities, has become a profound symbol of aloha aina, or love of the land, and environmental resilience, representing the collective effort to heal the island through reforestation, soil conservation, and cultural renewal. The legislature notes that the Protect Kahoʻolawe ʻOhana, Kahoʻolawe island reserve commission, and department of land and natural resources have undertaken the stewardship of the island, restoring vital cultural practices such as the Makahiki ceremony, which embodies the relationship between the Hawaiian people and the land, as well as ongoing conservation efforts to restore Kahoolawe's natural ecosystem. The legislature believes that the efforts over the past fifty years to restore and steward Kahoolawe exemplify the practice of aloha aina and the resilience of the Hawaiian community to protect and care for their land.  The legislature further believes that the many individuals who have engaged in stewardship of Kahoolawe have been inspired to provide stewardship of aina on their home islands. The purpose of this Act is to authorize the issuance of special number plates to recognize the island of Kahoolawe. SECTION 2.  Chapter 249, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§249-    Special number plates for the recognition of the island of Kahoolawe authorized.  (a)  Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the director of finance shall issue to any registered owner of a vehicle, who is a resident of the State, upon completed application and payment of required fees, a special number plate for the registered owner's vehicle commemorating the island of Kahoolawe. (b) The director of finance of the city and county of Honolulu, in consultation with the directors of finance of the counties of Kauai, Maui, and Hawaii; the chiefs of police of the city and county of Honolulu, and the counties of Kauai, Maui, and Hawaii; and the board of directors of the Kohe Mālamalama o Kanaloa Protect Kahoʻolawe Fund, shall establish a special number plate design that: (1)  Contains words, images, or both, that indicate the special number plate is issued to recognize the island of Kahoolawe; (2)  Is similar in shape and size to the uniform state number plate prescribed by law; and (3)  Does not obstruct the visibility of the number or letters of any other information that is required by law to be on a number plate and are readily identifiable and distinguishable under actual traffic conditions. (c)  The special number plate design shall not: (1)  Infringe or otherwise violate any trademark, trade name, service mark, copyright, or other proprietary or property right; (2)  Represent any obscene or degrading image, idea, word, or phrase; (3)  Advertise or endorse a product, brand, or service that is provided for sale; (4)  Promote any religious belief; (5)  Promote any philosophy based on prejudice or that is contrary to state civil rights laws; or (6)  Is no larger than inches wide by inches high. (d)  Each special number plate shall be securely fastened to the motor vehicle in lieu of the uniform state number plate. (e)  The director of finance shall charge a special number plate fee at least equal to the county's cost of providing the special number plate and administrative costs, if any, plus a fundraising fee to be determined by the director of finance in consultation with the board of directors of the Kohe Mālamalama o Kanaloa Protect Kahoʻolawe Fund.  The fundraising fee shall be in addition to any other state or county fees collected for a motor vehicle registration or license plate. (f)  The director of finance may charge an additional fundraising fee of the same or a different amount as the fundraising fee established pursuant to subsection (e), for the renewal of a special number plate.  If an additional fundraising fee is implemented pursuant to this subsection, the director of finance shall revoke the special number plate of the registered owner of a motor vehicle who fails to pay the additional fundraising fee imposed by this subsection. (g)  The revenue generated by the fundraising fees, or a portion of the revenue generated by the fundraising fees as determined by the director of finance, shall be deposited in the name of the Kohe Mālamalama o Kanaloa Protect Kahoʻolawe Fund in a separate county budget account.  The director of finance shall determine the most efficient means of directing the revenue generated by the fundraising fees to the Kohe Mālamalama o Kanaloa Protect Kahoʻolawe Fund. (h)  The director of finance may revoke all special number plates issued pursuant to this section if the total number of registered owners of motor vehicles that obtain the special number plate is less than one hundred fifty within three years of issuance of the first special number plate. (i)  Nothing in this section shall be construed to apply to any plates issued pursuant to section 249-9.2. (j)  For the purposes of this section, unless a different meaning appears from the context, "special number plate" means a license plate that represents the island of Kahoolawe." SECTION 3.  Section 249-9.3, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (e) to read as follows: "(e)  The design of the decal used on an organization's special number plate shall not: (1)  Infringe or otherwise violate any trademark, trade name, service mark, copyright, or other proprietary or property right; (2)  Represent any obscene or degrading image, idea, word, or phrase; (3)  Advertise or endorse a product, brand, or service that is provided for sale; (4)  Promote any religious belief; [or] (5)  Promote any philosophy based on prejudice or that is contrary to state civil rights laws; or (6)  Be more than inches wide by       inches high; provided that the decal does not obstruct the visibility of the number or letters or any other information that is required by law to be on the license plate and is readily identifiable and distinguishable under actual traffic conditions." SECTION 4.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 5.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 3000.